Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.20, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 60.20. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall


provide annual domestic violence, substance abuse, addiction and


mental health educational training for members of the judiciary.


Any judge who presides over domestic violence cases shall receive


eight (8) hours of continuing education as described in this section


per year. Subject to available funding, curriculum for training


required under this section shall include, but not be limited to:


1. Dynamics of domestic violence;


2. The impact of domestic violence on victims and their


children including trauma and the neurobiology of trauma;

Req. No. 1220 Page 1


3. Identifying dominant aggressor;


4. Tactics and behavior of batterers;


5. Victim protection orders and full faith and credit under the


Violence Against Women Act of 1994;


6. Rights of victims; and


7. Evidence-based practices regarding behavioral health and


treatment of those with substance abuse or mental health needs.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1220 TEK 1/16/2025 3:30:51 PM





























Req. No. 1220 Page 2